Massachusetts, session 194th, H675.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1: Chapter 70 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
section 17 the following section:-
Section 18. SCHOOL SUPPLIES FOR TEACHERS PROGRAM
(1) For the purposes of this section, the following terms shall have the following
meanings unless the context clearly requires otherwise.
“Authorized ecommerce vendor” means an ecommerce vendor that has been approved by
the Executive Office of Education.
“Ecommerce” means a commercial transaction, which may include the transmission of
funds or data or both, conducted electronically via the internet.
“Eligible teacher” means a teacher employed in good standing at a public school in this
Commonwealth pursuant to a school year contract and who has the primary responsibility of
of 3

providing classroom instruction to students for not less than 60 percent of each school day on
average, measured weekly.
“School Supplies for Teachers Program” or “program” means the program established
pursuant to this part to provide financial and technical assistance to eligible teachers who
purchase school supplies online as provided in this part.
“User” means an eligible teacher who is certified by a participating local school system
or public school as eligible to participate in the program and who has a user account.
“User account” means the unique platform account.
(2) The School Supplies for Teachers Program is established to provide financial and
technical assistance to teachers who purchase school supplies online
(3) The requirements of this part shall be subject to appropriation of funds by the
General Court or the availability of other funds for such purpose.
(4) The Department of Elementary and Secondary Education shall:
(a) Establish a program to allocate funds for eligible teachers to be used at the
discretion of such teachers for the online purchase of school supplies as provided herein;
(b) Establish such policies, rules, and regulations as necessary for the
implementation; and
(c) Identify one or more authorized software services providers to offer and support a
user-friendly online ecommerce platform that:
of 3

(i) Processes the allocation of funds to the user accounts of eligible teachers for the
online purchase of school supplies from authorized ecommerce vendors; and
(ii) Includes appropriate fiscal management and payment systems and reporting and
training tools, as required by the Executive Office of Education.
(d) Ensure that purchases using program funds are restricted to online purchases of
school supplies from authorized ecommerce vendors;
(e) Promulgate guidelines and provide technical assistance to facilitate local school
systems, public schools, and teachers utilizing the program and to ensure program purchases are
restricted to allowable expenses; and
(f) Establish processes as necessary for the implementation of the program consistent
with the policies, rules, and regulations of the Executive Office of Education.
(5) Each local school system or public school shall certify, as required by the
Department Elementary and Secondary Education, the eligibility of each teacher employed by
such local school system or public school who requests a user account; provided, that to be
eligible for a user account a teacher shall be employed in good standing at a public school
pursuant to a school year contract and have the primary responsibility of providing classroom
instruction to students not less than 60 percent of each school day on average, measured weekly.
of 3